Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NATURAL RESOURCES RESEARCH INSTITUTE.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $650,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account in the special revenue fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute to evaluate the state's geologic hydrogen potential. new text end new text begin (b) The evaluation must include: new text end new text begin (1) the availability of the mined hydrogen resource; new text end new text begin (2) the feasibility of extracting the hydrogen from underground deposits; new text end new text begin (3) the potential groundwater management challenges; and new text end new text begin (4) cost-effective strategies for storing and transporting mined hydrogen. new text end new text begin (c) The Natural Resources Research Institute must submit the evaluation and interim report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over energy policy and finance by May 15, 2027, and a final report by May 15, 2028. new text end